Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4968.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 8, article 1, section 3, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Total Appropriation $ deleted text begin 114,258,000 deleted text end new text begin 123,181,000 new text end $ deleted text begin 120,091,000 deleted text end new text begin 131,011,000 new text end The appropriations in this section are from the general fund to the Metropolitan Council. Sec. 2. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 8, article 1, section 3, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Special Transportation Service deleted text begin 112,507,000 deleted text end new text begin 121,430,000 new text end deleted text begin 118,340,000 deleted text end new text begin 129,260,000 new text end This appropriation is for special transportation service under Minnesota Statutes, section 473.386, including Metro Mobility and Metro Move.